California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Establish an Internet Web page located on the department’s public Internet Web site dedicated exclusively to processing complaints and inquiries relating to health insurance issues from insureds and their health care providers. The Web page shall provide insureds and their health care providers with information concerning filing a complaint and making an inquiry concerning a health insurer and, at a minimum, shall provide the following information:

(1) The department’s toll-free telephone number.

(2) A list of all health insurers licensed by the department.

(3) Educational and informational guides for health insurance consumers and health care providers describing their rights under this code. The guides shall be easy to read and understand and shall be made available to the public, including access on the department’s Internet Web site.

(4) A separate, standardized complaint form for health care providers to file a complaint.

(c) An insured or health care provider may file a written complaint with the department with respect to the handling of a claim or other obligation under a health insurance policy by a health insurer or production agency, or with respect to the alleged misconduct by a health insurer or production agency. The commissioner shall notify the complainant of the receipt of the complaint within 10 business days of its receipt. The commissioner shall make a determination on the complaint within 60 calendar days of the date of its receipt, unless the commissioner, in his or her discretion, determines that additional time is reasonably necessary to fully and fairly evaluate the complaint. The commissioner shall notify the complainant of the final action taken on his or her complaint within 30 days of the final action. The notification shall include a summary explaining the commissioner’s reasons for the final action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10133.66 (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 723) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 405, Sec. 9.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 14 of Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.67.

Pursuant to Section 12921, the commissioner may also agree to payment to a health care provider who submitted a claim for health care benefits provided to an insured that are covered under the insured’s health insurance policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 723, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.7.

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, any disability insurer shall pay group insurance benefits contingent upon, or for expenses incurred on account of, hospitalization or medical or surgical aid to the person or persons having provided or having paid for the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid where that person has qualified for reimbursement by submitting the items and information specified in subdivisions (b) and (c). The amount of any such payment shall not exceed the amount of benefit provided by the policy with respect to the service or billing of the provider of aid, and the amount of payments shall not exceed the amount of expenses incurred on account of the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid. Payment so made shall discharge the insurer’s obligation with respect to the amount so paid.

(b) The items which shall be submitted to the insurer for reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (a) are as follows:

(1) Proof of payment of medical services and a provider’s itemized bill for service.

(2) In the case where the insured does not reside with the person or persons seeking hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, either a copy of the judicial order requiring the insured to provide dependent coverage or a state approved form verifying the existence of a judicial order to be filed with the insurer on an annual basis.

(3) In the case where the insured does not reside with the person or persons seeking hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, and the provider is seeking direct reimbursement, an itemized bill with the signature of the custodial parent or guardian certifying that services being billed for have been provided and, on an annual basis, either a copy of the judicial order requiring the insured to provide dependent coverage or a state approved form verifying the existence of a judicial order.

(c) When seeking payment from an insurer, a person shall provide an insurer the items specified in subdivision (b) with the name and address of the person to be reimbursed, the name and policy number of the insured, the name of the individual for whom hospitalization or medical or surgical aid has been provided, and other necessary information directly related to coverage under the policy.

(d) In the case of a Medi-Cal beneficiary, where the State Department of Health Services has paid for the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, any disability insurer shall pay group insurance benefits to the State Department of Health Services for expenses contingent upon, or incurred on account of hospitalization or medical or surgical aid. Payment so made shall discharge the insurer’s obligation with respect to the amount so paid. The amount of any such payment shall not exceed the amount of benefit provided by the policy with respect to the service or billing of the provider of aid, and the amount of payments shall not exceed the amount of expenses incurred on account of hospitalization or medical or surgical aid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 744, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.8.

(a) The commissioner shall, on or before January 1, 2006, promulgate regulations applicable to all individual and group policies of health insurance establishing standards and requirements to provide insureds with appropriate access to translated materials and language assistance in obtaining covered benefits. A health insurer that participates in the Healthy Families Program may assess the Healthy Families Program enrollee population separately from the remainder of its population for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). An insurer that chooses to separate its Healthy Families Program enrollment from the remainder of its population shall treat the Healthy Families Program population separately for purposes of determining whether subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) is applicable and
 shall also treat the Healthy Families Program population separately for purposes of applying the percentage and numerical thresholds in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(b) The regulations described in subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) A requirement to conduct an assessment of the needs of the insured group, pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Requirements for surveying the language preferences and assessment of linguistic needs of insureds within one year of the effective date of the regulations that permit health insurers to utilize various survey methods, including, but not limited to, the use of existing enrollment and renewal processes, newsletters, or other mailings. Health insurers shall update the linguistic needs assessment, demographic profile, and language translation
 requirements every three years. However, the regulations may provide that the surveys and assessments by insurers of supplemental insurance products may be conducted less frequently than three years if the commissioner determines that the results are unlikely to affect the translation requirements.

(3) Requirements for the translation of vital documents that include the following:

(A) A requirement that all vital documents, as defined pursuant to subparagraph (B), be translated into an indicated language, as follows:

(i) A health insurer with an insured population of 1,000,000 or more shall translate vital documents into the top two languages other than English as determined by the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) and any additional languages when 0.75 percent or 15,000 of the insured population, whichever
 number is less, indicates in the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) a preference for written materials in that language.

(ii) A health insurer with an insured population of 300,000 or more but less than 1,000,000 shall translate vital documents into the top one language other than English as determined by the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) and any additional languages when 1 percent or 6,000 of the insured population, whichever number is less, indicates in the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) a preference for written materials in that language.

(iii) A health insurer with an insured population of less than 300,000 shall translate vital documents into a language other than English when 3,000 or more or 5 percent of the insured population, whichever number is less, indicates in the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) a preference for written
 materials in that language.

(B) Specification of vital documents produced by the insurer that are required to be translated. The specification of vital documents shall not exceed that of the United States Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) Office for Civil Rights (OCR) Policy Guidance (65 Federal Register 52762 (August 30, 2000)), but shall include all of the following:

(i) Applications.

(ii) Consent forms.

(iii) Letters containing important information regarding eligibility or participation criteria.

(iv) Notices pertaining to the denial, reduction, modification, or termination of services and benefits, the right to file a complaint or appeal.

(v) Notices advising limited-English-proficient persons of the availability of free language assistance and other outreach materials that are provided to insureds.

(vi) Translated documents shall not include an insurer’s explanation of benefits or similar claim processing information that are sent to insureds unless the document requires a response by the insured.

(C) For those documents described in subparagraph (B) that are not standardized but contain insured specific information, health insurers shall not be required to translate the documents into the threshold languages identified by the needs assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) but rather shall include with the document a written notice of the availability of interpretation services in the threshold languages identified by the needs assessment pursuant to
 paragraph (2). A health insurer subject to the requirements in Section 10133.11 shall also include with the documents a written notice of the availability of interpretation services in the top 15 languages spoken by limited-English-proficient (LEP) individuals in California as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(i) Upon request, the insured shall receive a written translation of those documents. The health insurer shall have up to, but not to exceed, 21 days to comply with the insured’s request for a written translation. If an enrollee requests a translated document, all timeframes and deadlines requirements related to the documents that apply to the health insurer and insureds under the provisions of this chapter and under any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall begin to run upon the health insurer’s issuance of the translated document.

(ii) For appeals that require expedited review and response in accordance with the statutes and regulations of this chapter, the health insurer may satisfy this requirement by providing notice of the availability and access to oral interpretation services.

(D) A requirement that health insurers advise limited-English-proficient insureds of the availability of interpreter services.

(4) Standards to ensure the quality and accuracy of the written translation and that a translated document meets the same standards required for the English version of the document. The English language documents shall determine the rights and obligations of the parties, and the translated documents shall be admissible in evidence only if there is a dispute regarding a substantial difference in the material terms and conditions of the English language document and the translated document.

(5) Requirements for individual access to interpretation services that include the following:

(A) A requirement that an interpreter meets, at a minimum, all of the following qualifications:

(i) Demonstrated proficiency in both English and the target language.

(ii) Knowledge in both English and the target language of health care terminology and concepts relevant to health care delivery systems.

(iii) Adheres to generally accepted interpreter ethics principles, including client confidentiality.

(B) A requirement that the insured with limited English proficiency shall not be required to provide their own interpreter or rely on a
 staff member who does not meet the qualifications described in subparagraph (A) to communicate directly with the limited-English-proficient insured.

(C) A requirement that the insured with limited English proficiency shall not be required to rely on an adult or minor child accompanying the insured to interpret or facilitate communication except under either of the following circumstances:

(i) In an emergency, as described in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code, if a qualified interpreter is not immediately available for the insured with limited English proficiency.

(ii) If the individual with limited English proficiency specifically requests that the accompanying adult interpret or facilitate communication, the accompanying adult agrees to provide that assistance, and reliance on that accompanying adult for
 that assistance is appropriate under the circumstances.

(6) Standards to ensure the quality and timeliness of oral interpretation services provided by health insurers.

(c) In developing the regulations, standards, and requirements described in this section, the commissioner shall consider the following:

(1) Publications and standards issued by federal agencies, including the Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services (CLAS) in Health Care issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of Minority Health in December 2000, and the United States Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) Office for Civil Rights (OCR) Policy Guidance 65 (65 Federal Register 52762 (August 30, 2000)).

(2) Other cultural and linguistic
 requirements under state programs, including the Medi-Cal Managed Care Policy Letters, cultural and linguistic requirements imposed by the State Department of Health Care Services on health care service plans that contract to provide Medi-Cal managed care services, and cultural and linguistic requirements imposed by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board on health insurers that contract to provide services in the Healthy Families Program.

(3) Standards adopted by other states pertaining to language assistance requirements for health insurers.

(4) Standards established by California or nationally recognized accrediting, certifying, or licensing organizations and medical and health care interpreter professional associations regarding interpretation services.

(5) Publications, guidelines, reports, and recommendations
 issued by state agencies or advisory committees, such as the report to the Legislature from the Task Force on Culturally and Linguistically Competent Physicians and Dentists required pursuant to former Section 852 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) Examples of best practices relating to language assistance services by health care providers and health insurers that contract for alternative rates of payment with providers, including existing practices.

(7) Information gathered from complaints to the commissioner and consumer assistance help lines regarding language assistance services.

(8) The cost of compliance and the availability of translation and interpretation services and professionals.

(9) Flexibility to accommodate variations in networks and method of service delivery. The commissioner shall allow for health insurer flexibility in determining compliance with the standards for oral and written interpretation services.

(d) In designing the regulations, the commissioner shall consider all other relevant guidelines in an effort to accomplish maximum accessibility within a cost-efficient system of indemnification. The commissioner shall seek public input from a wide range of interested parties.

(e) Services, verbal communications, and written materials provided by or developed by the health insurers that contract for alternative
 rates of payment with providers, shall comply with the standards developed under this section.

(f) Beginning on January 1, 2008, the department shall report biennially to the Legislature regarding health insurer compliance with the standards established by this section, including results of compliance audits made in conjunction with other audits and reviews. The department shall also utilize the reported information to make recommendations for changes that further enhance standards pursuant to this section. The commissioner shall work to ensure that the biennial reports required by this section, and the data collected for the reports, do not require duplicative or conflicting data collection with other reports that may be required by government-sponsored programs. The commissioner may also delay or otherwise phase in implementation of the standards and requirements in recognition of costs and availability of translation and interpretation
 services and professionals.

(g) This section does not prohibit government purchasers from including in their contracts additional translation or interpretation requirements, to meet the linguistic and cultural needs, beyond those set forth pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 58.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.9.

Within a year after the health insurer’s assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10133.8, health insurers shall report to the Department of Insurance on internal policies and procedures related to cultural appropriateness, in a format specified by the department, in the following ways:

(a) Collection of data regarding the insured population based on the needs assessment as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10133.8.

(b) Education of health insurer staff who have routine contact with insureds regarding the diverse needs of the insured population.

(c) Recruitment and retention efforts that encourage workforce diversity.

(d) Evaluation of the health insurer’s programs and services with respect to the insurer’s enrollee populations, using processes such as an analysis of complaints and satisfaction survey results.

(e) The periodic provision of information regarding the ethnic diversity of the insurer’s insured population and any related strategies to insurers providers. Insurers may use existing means of communication.

(f) The periodic provision of educational information to insureds on the insurer’s services and programs. Insurers may use existing means of communication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 713, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.10.

(a) An insurer that markets, advertises, or produces educational materials for a health insurance policy, as defined in Section 106, in the individual or small group health insurance markets, or allows any other person or business to market or advertise on its behalf in the individual or small group health insurance markets, in a non-English language that does not meet the requirements set forth in Sections 10133.8 and 10133.9, shall provide the following documents in the same non-English language:

(1) Welcome letters or notices of initial coverage, if applicable.

(2) Applications for health insurance and any information pertinent to
 eligibility or participation.

(3) Notices advising limited-English-proficient persons of the availability of no-cost translation and interpretation services.

(4) Notices pertaining to the right and instructions on how an insured may file a grievance.

(5) The uniform summary of benefits and coverage required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10603.

(b) An insurer shall use trained and qualified translators for the translation of all marketing and advertising materials relating to health insurance products and for all of the documents specified in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that does not offer an essential
 health benefit as defined in Section 10112.27.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 447, Sec. 2.   (SB 353)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.11.

(a) An insurer shall notify insureds and members of the public of all of the following information:

(1) The availability of language assistance services, including oral interpretation and translated written materials, free of charge and in a timely manner pursuant to Section 10133.8, and how to access these services. This information shall be available in the top 15 languages spoken by limited-English-proficient individuals in California as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) The availability of appropriate auxiliary aids and services, including qualified interpreters for individuals with disabilities and information in alternate formats, free of charge and in a timely
 manner, when those aids and services are necessary to ensure an equal opportunity to participate for individuals with disabilities.

(3) An insurer does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, ancestry, religion, sex, marital status, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

(4) How to file a complaint, including the name of the health insurer representative and the telephone number, address, and email address of the health insurer representative who may be contacted about the complaint, and how to submit the complaint to the department for review.

(5) How to file a discrimination complaint with the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office for Civil Rights if there is a concern of discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age, disability, or
 sex.

(b) The information required to be provided pursuant to this section shall be provided to an insured with individual coverage upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal, and to insureds with group coverage upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal. An insurer may include this information with other materials sent to the insured. The information shall also be provided in the following manner:

(1) In a conspicuously visible location in the evidence of coverage.

(2) At least annually, in or with newsletters, outreach, or other materials that are routinely disseminated to the health insurer’s insureds.

(3) On the Internet Web site published and maintained by the health insurer, in a manner that allows insureds,
 prospective insureds, and members of the public to easily locate the information.

(c) (1) A specialized health insurance policy that is not a covered entity, as defined in Section 92.4 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, subject to Section 1557 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18116) may request a waiver from the requirements under this section.

(2) The department shall not grant a waiver under this subdivision to a specialized health insurance policy that arranges for mental health or behavioral health benefits.

(3) The department shall provide information on its Internet Web site about any waivers granted under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 156.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.12.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2027, or when final federal rules are implemented, whichever occurs later, the department shall require a health insurer to establish and maintain the following application programming interfaces (API) for the benefit of all insureds and contracted providers, as applicable:

(1) Patient access API.

(2) Provider access API.

(3) Payer-to-payer API.

(4) Prior authorization API.

(b) API described in subdivision (a) shall be in accordance with standards published in a final rule issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and published in the Federal Register,
 and shall align with federal effective dates, including enforcement delays and suspensions, issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(c) Until January 1, 2027, the commissioner may issue guidance to health insurers regarding compliance with this section and that guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) This section does not limit existing requirements under this chapter, including, but not limited to, Section 10133.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.13.

(a) (1) Within six months after the department issues guidance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and no later than March 1, 2025, a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers health insurance policies for health care coverage in this state, including a grandfathered health insurance policy, but not including specialized health insurance policies that provide only dental or vision services, shall require
 all of its health insurer staff who are in direct contact with insureds in the delivery of care or insured services to complete evidence-based cultural competency training for the purpose of providing trans-inclusive health care for individuals who identify as transgender, gender diverse, or intersex (TGI).

(2) An evidence-based cultural competency training implemented pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following:

(A) Information about the effects, including, but not limited to, ongoing personal effects, of historical and contemporary exclusion and oppression of TGI communities.

(B) Information about communicating more effectively across gender identities, including TGI-inclusive terminology, using people’s
 correct names and pronouns, even when they are not reflected in records or legal documents; avoiding language, whether verbal or nonverbal, that demeans, ridicules, or condemns TGI individuals; and avoiding making assumptions about gender identity by using gender-neutral language and avoiding language that presumes all individuals are heterosexual, cisgender or gender conforming, or nonintersex.

(C) Discussion on health inequities within the TGI community, including family and community acceptance.

(D) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and TGI-serving organizations, including, but not limited to, the California Transgender Advisory Council.

(E) Recognition of the difference between personal values and professional
 responsibilities with regard to serving TGI people.

(F) Facilitation by TGI-serving organizations.

(3) Use of any training curricula for purposes of implementing paragraph (1) shall be subject to approval by the department, following stakeholder engagement with local constituency groups and TGI-serving organizations, including, but not limited to, the California Transgender Advisory Council.

(4) After first-time completion of the evidence-based cultural
 competency training, in the form of initial basic training, an individual described in paragraph (1) shall complete a refresher course if a complaint has been filed, and a decision has been made in favor of the complainant, against that individual for not providing trans-inclusive health care, or on a more frequent basis if deemed necessary by the health insurer or the department for purposes of providing trans-inclusive health care.

(b) (1) No later than September 1, 2024, the department shall develop and implement procedures, and may impose sanctions pursuant to any applicable
 enforcement provisions, to ensure that a health insurer is compliant with the requirements described in subdivision (a).

(2) Within six months after the department issues guidance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the department shall track and monitor complaints received by the department related to trans-inclusive health care and publicly report this data with other complaint data on its website or with other public reports containing complaint data.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “TGI” means transgender,
 gender diverse, or intersex.

(2) “TGI-serving organization” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 150900 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Trans-inclusive health care” means comprehensive health care that is consistent with the standards of care for individuals who identify as TGI, honors an individual’s personal bodily autonomy, does not make assumptions about an individual’s gender, accepts gender fluidity and nontraditional gender presentation, and treats everyone with compassion, understanding, and respect.

(d) (1) Within
 six months of development of the quality standard and recommendations for curriculum pursuant to Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code and no later than September 1, 2024, the department shall develop guidance and procedures for compliance with this section. In developing guidance pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall consider the recommendations made by the working group pursuant to Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of guidance
 or similar instructions, until regulations are adopted.

(3) The department shall adopt regulations for purposes of this section by July 1, 2027, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code, until regulations are adopted.
 In developing the regulations, the department shall consider the recommendations made by the working group pursuant to Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) If a health insurer delegates duties under this section to a contracted entity, including, but not limited to, a medical group or independent practice association, then the entity to which those duties are delegated shall comply with this section.

(f) The commissioner may take enforcement action, including, but not limited to, imposing penalties for noncompliance with the requirements of this section or regulations promulgated thereunder. If the commissioner determines that a health insurer, or an entity contracted with the health insurer, has violated this section, the commissioner may,
 after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), by order, assess a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or if a violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 822, Sec. 5.   (SB 923)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.14.

No later than March 1, 2025, a health insurer subject to Section 10133.13 shall include information within or accessible from the insurer’s provider directory, and accessible through the insurer’s call center, that identifies which of an insurer’s in-network providers have affirmed that they
 offer and have provided gender-affirming services, including, but not limited to, feminizing mammoplasty, male chest reconstruction, mastectomy, gender-confirming facial surgery, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, penectomy, orchiectomy, feminizing genitoplasty, metoidioplasty, phalloplasty, scrotoplasty, voice masculinization or feminization, hormone therapy related to gender dysphoria or intersex conditions, gender-affirming gynecological care, or voice therapy related to gender dysphoria or intersex conditions.
 This information shall be updated when an in-network provider requests its inclusion or exclusion as a provider that offers and provides gender-affirming services. Nothing in this act alters any business establishment’s obligation to provide full and equal services to customers or patients regardless of their sex and other protected characteristics, pursuant to the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code) and other applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 822, Sec. 6.   (SB 923)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Transfers of Structured Settlement Payment Rights [10134. - 10139.5.]

10134.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Buyer’s first right of refusal” means any provision in the transfer agreement or related documents that obligate the payee to give to the buyer the first choice or option to purchase any remaining structured settlement rights belonging to the payee.

(b) “Dependents” include the payee’s spouse and minor children and all other family members and other persons for whom the payee is legally obligated to provide support, including alimony.

(c) “Discounted present value” means the fair present value of future payments, as determined by discounting those payments to the present using the most recently published applicable federal rate for determining the present value of an annuity, as issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service.

(d) “Effective equivalent interest rate,” with respect to a transfer of structured settlement payment rights, means the annualized rate of interest on the net advance amount, calculated by treating the transferred structured settlement payments as if they were installment payments on a loan, with each payment applied first to accrued
 unpaid interest and then to principal.

(e) “Expenses” means all broker’s commissions, service charges, application or processing fees, closing costs, filing or administrative charges, legal fees, notary fees and other commissions, fees, costs, and charges that a payee would have to pay to transfer the structured settlement payment rights of a structured settlement agreement or that would be deducted from the gross consideration that would be paid to the payee in connection with the transfer of the structured settlement payment rights of a structured settlement agreement.

(f) “Independent professional advice” means advice of an attorney, certified public accountant, actuary, or other licensed professional adviser meeting all of the following requirements:

(1) The adviser is engaged by a claimant or payee to render
 advice concerning the legal, tax, or financial implications of a structured settlement or a transfer of structured settlement payment rights.

(2) The adviser’s compensation for rendering independent professional advice is not affected by occurrence or lack of occurrence of a settlement or transfer.

(3) A particular adviser is not referred to the payee by the transferee or its agent, except that the transferee may refer the payee to a lawyer referral service or agency operated by a state or local bar association.

(g) “Interested parties” means, with respect to a structured settlement agreement, the payee, the payee’s attorney, any beneficiary irrevocably designated under the annuity contract to receive payments following the payee’s death, the annuity issuer, the structured settlement obligor, and any other party who
 has continuing rights or obligations under the structured settlement agreement. If the designated beneficiary is a minor, the beneficiary’s parent or guardian shall be an interested party.

(h) “Payee” means an individual who received tax-free payments pursuant to a structured settlement agreement.

(i) “Qualified assignment agreement” means an agreement providing for a qualified assignment within the meaning of Section 130 of Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(j) “Structured settlement agreement” means an arrangement for periodic payment of damages established by settlement or judgment in resolution of a tort claim in which the payment of the judgment or award is paid in whole, or in part, in periodic tax-free payments rather than a lump-sum payment. A structured settlement agreement
 entered into pursuant to Section 667.7 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 970.6 or 984 of the Government Code is not subject to the provisions of this article other than the requirements of Section 10138.

(k) “Structured settlement obligor” means the party that has the continuing periodic payment obligation to the payee under a structured settlement agreement or a qualified assignment agreement.

(l) “Structured settlement payment rights” means rights to receive periodic payments, including lump-sum payments, pursuant to a structured settlement agreement, whether from the settlement obligor or an annuity issuer.

(m)“Terms of the structured settlement” include, with respect to a structured settlement agreement, the terms of the structured settlement agreement, annuity contract, qualified assignment
 agreement, and any order or approval of a court or responsible administrative authority or other governmental authority authorizing or approving the structured settlement.

(n) “Transfer” means any sale, assignment, pledge, hypothecation, or other form of alienation or encumbrance made for consideration.

(o) “Transfer agreement” means the agreement providing for the transfer, and any other document used to effectuate the transfer, from the payee to the transferee of structured settlement payment rights of a structured settlement agreement.

(p) “Transferee” means any person receiving structured settlement payment rights resulting from a transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   (SB 510)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10135.

(a) This article is only applicable to transfers entered into on or after January 1, 2000.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the changes to this article made by the act amending this section in the 2001–02 Regular Session shall only be applicable to transfers entered into on or after January 1, 2002.

(c) This article is only applicable to transfers of structured settlement payment rights if one of the following requirements is met:

(1) The payee is domiciled in California at the time the transfer agreement is signed by the payee.

(2) The payee is not domiciled in California at the time the transfer agreement is signed and the state where the payee is domiciled does not have a structured settlement transfer statute, but either the structured settlement obligor or annuity issuer is domiciled in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   (SB 510)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10136.
